California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(2) The applicant is qualified under the provisions of
 this chapter.

(3) The case is not a fee-generating case, as defined in Section 8030.4.

(4) The invoice or other documentation shall evidence that the certified shorthand reporter to be reimbursed was, at the time the services were rendered, a duly licensed certified shorthand reporter.

(5) The invoice shall be accompanied by a statement, signed by the applicant, stating that the charges are for transcripts actually provided as indicated on the invoice.

(6) The applicant has acknowledged, in writing, that as a condition of entitlement for reimbursement that the applicant agrees to refund the entire amount disbursed from the Transcript Reimbursement Fund from any costs or attorney’s fees awarded to the applicant by the court or provided for in any
 settlement agreement in the case.

(7) The certified shorthand reporter’s invoice for transcripts shall include separate itemizations of charges claimed, as follows:

(A) Total charges and rates for customary services in preparation of an original transcript and one copy or a copy of the transcript of depositions.

(B) Total charges and rates for expedited deposition transcripts.

(C) Total charges and rates in connection with transcription of court proceedings.

(b) For an applicant claiming to be eligible pursuant to subdivision (j), (l), or (m) of Section 8030.4, a letter from the director of the project or center, certifying that the project or center meets the standards set forth in one of
 those subdivisions and that the litigant or litigants are indigent persons, is sufficient documentation to establish eligibility.

(c) For an applicant claiming to be eligible pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 8030.4, a letter certifying that the applicant meets the requirements of that subdivision, that the case is not a fee-generating case, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 8030.4, and that the litigant or litigants are indigent persons, together with a letter from the director of a project or center defined in subdivision (j), (l), or (m) of Section 8030.4 certifying that the litigant or litigants had been referred by that project or center to the applicant, is sufficient documentation to establish eligibility.

(d) The applicant may receive reimbursement directly from the board if the applicant has previously paid the certified shorthand reporter for transcripts as
 provided in Section 8030.6. To receive payment directly, the applicant shall submit, in addition to all other required documentation, an itemized statement signed by the certified shorthand reporter performing the services that describes payment for transcripts in accordance with the requirements of Section 8030.6.

(e) The board may prescribe appropriate forms to be used by applicants and certified shorthand reporters to facilitate these requirements.

(f) This chapter does not restrict the contractual obligation or payment for services, including, but not limited to, billing the applicant directly, during the pendency of the claim.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 587, Sec. 11.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8031.

The amount of the fees required by this chapter is that fixed by the board in accordance with the following schedule:

(a) The fee for filing an application for each examination shall be no more than forty dollars ($40).

(b) The fee for examination and reexamination for each of the written or practical parts of the examination shall be in an amount fixed by the board, which shall be equal to the actual cost of preparing, administering, grading, and analyzing the examination, but shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75) for each separate part, for each administration.

(c) The initial
 certificate fee is an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which the certificate is issued, except that, if the certificate will expire less than 180 days after its issuance, then the fee is 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which the certificate is issued, or fifty dollars ($50), whichever is greater. The board may, by appropriate regulation, provide for the waiver or refund of the initial certificate fee where the certificate is issued less than 45 days before the date on which it will expire.

(d) By a resolution adopted by the board, a renewal fee may be established in such amounts and at such times as the board may deem appropriate to meet its operational expenses and funding responsibilities as set forth in this chapter. The
 renewal fee shall not be more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor less than ten dollars ($10) annually, with the following exception:

Any person who is employed full time by the State of California as a hearing reporter and who does not otherwise render shorthand reporting services for a fee shall be exempt from licensure while in state employment and shall not be subject to the renewal fee provisions of this subdivision until 30 days after leaving state employment. The renewal fee shall, in addition to the amount fixed by this subdivision, include any unpaid fees required by this section plus any delinquency fee.

(e) The duplicate certificate fee shall be no greater than ten dollars ($10).

(f) The penalty for failure to notify the
 board of a change of name or address as required by Section 8024.6 shall be no greater than fifty dollars ($50).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 463, Sec. 12.   (AB 1520)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Shorthand Reporting Corporations [8040. - 8051.]

8040.

A shorthand reporting corporation is a corporation which is authorized to render professional services, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, as long as that corporation and all of its shareholders, officers, directors, and employees rendering professional services who are certified shorthand reporters are in compliance with the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, this article, and all other statutes and regulations now or hereafter enacted or adopted pertaining to that corporation and the conduct of its officers. With respect to a shorthand reporting corporation, the governmental agency referred to in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act is the Court Reporters Board of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 216.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8042.

It shall constitute unprofessional conduct and a violation of this chapter for any person licensed under this chapter to violate, attempt to violate, directly or indirectly, or assist in or abet the violation of, or conspire to violate any provision or term of this article, the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, or any regulations duly adopted under those laws.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1289, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8043.

The name of a shorthand reporting corporation and any name or names under which it may be rendering professional services shall contain and be restricted to the name or the last name of one or more of the present, prospective, or former shareholders or of persons who were associated with a predecessor person, partnership, corporation or other organization and whose name or names appeared in the name of such predecessor organization, and shall include either (a) the words “shorthand reporting corporation;” (b) the title “certified shorthand reporter,” or the abbreviation “C.S.R.,” and wording or abbreviations denoting corporate existence; or (c) the words “a professional corporation.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1306.)
-------------------------------------------

8044.

Except as provided in Section 13403 of the Corporations Code, each director, shareholder, and officer of a shorthand reporting corporation shall be a licensed person as defined by Section 13401 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1306.)
-------------------------------------------

8045.

The income of a shorthand reporting corporation attributable to professional services rendered while a shareholder is a disqualified person, as defined by Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, shall not in any manner accrue to the benefit of such shareholder for his shares in the shorthand reporting corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1306.)
-------------------------------------------

8046.

A shorthand reporting corporation shall not do or fail to do any act the doing of which or the failure to do which would constitute unprofessional conduct under any statute, rule or regulation now or hereafter in effect which pertains to shorthand reporters or shorthand reporting. In conducting its practice it shall observe and be bound by such statutes, rules and regulations to the same extent as a person holding a license under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1289, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8047.

The board may formulate and enforce rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this article, including rules and regulations requiring (a) that the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a shorthand reporting corporation shall include a provision whereby the capital stock of such corporation owned by a disqualified person, as defined by Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, or a deceased person shall be sold to the corporation or the remaining shareholders within such time as such rules and regulations may provide; and (b) that a shorthand reporting corporation as a condition of obtaining a certificate pursuant to the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act and this article shall provide adequate security by insurance or otherwise for claims against it by its clients for errors and omissions arising out of the rendering of professional services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1306.)
-------------------------------------------

8050.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to enhance the regulation of licensed shorthand reporters and shorthand reporting corporations pursuant to this section, by imposing specific penalties in addition to other remedies permitted by this chapter that seek to discourage practices that are inconsistent with the integrity and impartiality required of officers of the court and to promote competition based upon the quality and price of shorthand reporting services.

(b) This section shall apply to an individual or entity that does any of the following:

(1) Any act that constitutes shorthand reporting that occurs wholly or partly in this state.

(2) Employs, independently contracts with, or recruits a licensed shorthand reporter to report or transcribe deposition testimony in a court proceeding or in a deposition.

(3) Contracts with a resident of this state by mail or otherwise that requires either party to perform licensed shorthand reporting wholly or partly in this state.

(4) Independently contracts with or is employed by an entity that does any of the acts described in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive.

(c) (1) This section does not apply to an individual, whether acting as an individual or as an officer, director, or shareholder of a shorthand reporting corporation, as defined in Section 8040, who possesses a valid license, issued pursuant to Section 8018, that may be revoked or suspended by the board, or to a shorthand
 reporting corporation that is in compliance with Section 8044.

(2) This section does not apply to a court, a party to litigation, an attorney of the party, or a full-time employee of the party or the attorney of the party, who provides or contracts for certified shorthand reporting for purposes related to the litigation.

(d) An individual or entity described in subdivision (b) shall not do any of the following:

(1) Seek compensation for a transcript that is in violation of the minimum transcript format standards set forth in Section 2473 of Article 8 of Division 24 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) Seek compensation for a certified court transcript applying fees other than those set out in Section 69950 of the Government Code.

(3) Make a transcript available to one party in advance of other parties, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 2025.510 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or offer or provide a service to only one party as described in subdivision (b) of Section 2025.320 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(4) Fail to promptly notify a party of a request for preparation of all or any part of a transcript, excerpts, or expedites for one party without the other parties’ knowledge, as described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 2475 of Article 8 of Division 24 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a licensed shorthand reporter, shorthand reporting corporation, or an individual or entity described in subdivision (b), from offering or providing long-term or
 multicase volume discounts or services ancillary to reporting and transcribing a deposition, arbitration, or judicial proceeding in contracts that are subject to laws related to shorthand reporting.

(f) An individual or entity that violates this section shall be subject to a civil fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation.

(g) The Attorney General, a district attorney, a city attorney, or the board may bring a civil action for a violation of this section, including an action for injunctive relief and any other appropriate relief, and shall be entitled, if they are the prevailing party, to recover reasonable attorney’s fees.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 214, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 74.   (SB 1443)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8051.

(a) On and after July 1, 2022, an entity that is not a shorthand reporting corporation may, wherever headquartered in the United States, engage in the conduct described in subdivision (b) of Section 8050 if it is approved for registration by the board after meeting all of the following requirements:

(1) The entity pays an initial annual registration fee to the board. Until January 1, 2025, the fee shall be five hundred dollars ($500). On and after January 1, 2025, the fee shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) or the board’s cost of administering this section, whichever is less.

(2) The entity has designated a board-certified reporter-in-charge who is a full-time employee of the registered entity
 and a resident of California, and who holds a currently valid California license at all times as a certified shorthand reporter where the certificate holder has no restrictions on their license and is not subject to a pending board accusation or investigation at the time of the entity’s application for registration. The reporter-in-charge shall be responsible to the board for an entity’s compliance with all state laws and regulations pertaining to and within the scope of the practice of certified shorthand reporting and any acts of the entity pertaining to and within the scope of the practice of a certificate holder shall be deemed acts of the reporter-in-charge. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed as permitting the board to restrict, suspend, or revoke the license of a reporter-in-charge for conduct committed or directed by another person unless the reporter-in-charge had knowledge of or knowingly participated in such conduct.

(3) The
 entity agrees in the registration to abide by the laws, regulations, and standards of practice applicable to businesses that render shorthand reporting services pursuant to Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, except for the requirements of Sections 8040 and 8044.

(b) An entity shall provide the board with all of the following information for consideration of initial registration pursuant to subdivision (a):

(1) The name and certificate number of the entity’s certified reporter-in-charge.

(2) Whether the entity, a controlling officer or parent corporation of the entity, the entity’s reporter-in-charge, or any of its officers, employees, or independent contractors, has been subject to any enforcement action, relating to the provision of court reporting services, by a state or federal agency within five years before
 submitting the initial registration. If so, the entity shall provide the board a copy of the operative complaint with the initial registration.

(3) Whether the entity, within five years before submitting the registration, has settled, or been adjudged to have liability for, a civil complaint alleging the entity or the entity’s reporter-in-charge engaged in misconduct relating to the provision of court reporting services for more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(4) Any additional documentation the board reasonably deems necessary for consideration in the initial registration process.

(c) Within 90 days of receiving a completed application for initial registration, including any disclosures made pursuant to subdivision (b), the board shall either approve the entity’s registration or deny the application upon a
 finding that a substantial risk would be posed to the public, which shall be subsequently provided to the applicant in writing with specificity as to the basis of that finding.

(d) A registration issued by the board pursuant to this section shall be valid for one year, at which time it may be approved for renewal by the board upon meeting the requirements of subdivision (a).

(e) A registered entity shall notify the board in writing within 30 days of the date when a reporter-in-charge ceases to act as the reporter-in-charge and propose another certificate holder to take over as the reporter-in-charge. The proposed replacement reporter-in-charge shall be subject to approval by the board. If disapproved, the entity shall propose another replacement within 15 days of the date of disapproval and shall continue to name proposed replacements until a reporter-in-charge is approved by the
 board.

(f) The board shall revoke the registration of an entity if the board determines the entity:

(1) Engaged, in whole or in part, through officers, employees, or independent contractors that are not certificate holders, in acts that are within the scope of practice of a certificate holder, unless otherwise permitted by law.

(2) Directed or authorized the reporter-in-charge to violate state laws or regulations pertaining to shorthand reporting or offering financial incentives to the reporter-in-charge for engaging in acts that violate state law.

(g) In addition to revoking an entity’s registration as required by subdivision (f), a registration issued under this section may be revoked, suspended, denied, restricted, or subjected to other disciplinary
 action as the board deems fit for violations of the laws or regulations pertaining to shorthand reporting by the entity’s officers, employees, or independent contractors, including the issuance of citations and fines.

(h) The board shall consider suspending the registration of an entity for a minimum of one year if the license of its reporter-in-charge is suspended or revoked for violating this section more than twice in a consecutive five-year period.

(i) An entity shall have the right to reasonable notice and opportunity to comment to and before the board regarding any determination to deny or revoke registration before that determination becomes final. An entity may seek review of a board decision to deny or revoke registration under this section either in an administrative hearing under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code or through an action brought pursuant to Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(j) A certificate holder shall not engage in the practice of shorthand reporting on behalf of an entity that the reporter knows or should know is not registered with the board and shall verify whether a person or entity is registered with the board before engaging in the practice of shorthand reporting on behalf of that person or entity.

(k) The board shall create and make available on its internet website a directory of registered entities. The board shall not take action against a certificate holder solely for a violation of subdivision (j) if the certificate holder reasonably relied on the board’s directory stating that the entity was registered at the time.

(l) The board may adopt regulations to implement this
 section, including emergency regulations during the years 2022 and 2023. The executive functions delegated to the board pursuant to Section 8005 include the discretion to inform the public of information that would be or is a public record regarding shorthand reporting corporations operating in this state.

(m) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 587, Sec. 12.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 14. Structural Pest Control Operators [8500. - 8697.4.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [8500. - 8519.5.]

8500.

Unless the text otherwise requires, the general provisions hereinafter set forth govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1163.)
-------------------------------------------

8501.

“Director” refers to the Director of Consumer Affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 8.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

8502.

“Board” refers to the Structural Pest Control Board within the Department of Consumers Affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 9.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

8503.

“Registrar” refers to the registrar of the Structural Pest Control Board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1163.)
-------------------------------------------

8503.5.

“Committee” means the Disciplinary Review Committee established pursuant to Section 8660.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1266, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8504.

“Person” includes an individual, firm, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association or other organization or any combination thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8504.1.

“Pesticide” includes any of the following:

(a) Any spray adjuvant.

(b) Any substance, or mixture of substances, which is intended to be used for preventing, destroying, repelling, or mitigating any pest or organism.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 1.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8504.2.

“Control” means a pest population management system that utilizes techniques to reduce and maintain pest populations at levels below those causing economic or material injury, or to manipulate the populations to prevent causing such injury.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 572, Sec. 1.   (SB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8504.3.

“Eradication” means the total elimination of a pest from a designated area. For purposes of this chapter, elimination and extermination shall have the same meaning as eradication.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   (SB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8504.4.

“Inspection” is the act of a field representative or operator physically performing an onsite assessment of real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 572, Sec. 3.   (SB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.

(a) “Structural pest control” and “pest control” as used in this chapter are synonymous. Except as provided in Section 8555 and elsewhere in this chapter, it is, with respect to household pests and wood destroying pests or organisms, or other pests that may invade households or other structures, including railroad cars, ships, docks, trucks, airplanes, or the contents thereof, the engaging in, offering to engage in, advertising for, soliciting, or the performance of, any of the following:

(1) Identification of infestations or infections.

(2) The making of an inspection or inspections for the purpose of identifying or
 attempting to identify infestations or infections of household or other structures by those pests or organisms.

(3) The making of inspection reports, recommendations, estimates, and bids, whether oral or written, with respect to those infestations or infections.

(4) The making of contracts, or the submitting of bids for, or the performance of any work including the making of structural repairs or replacements, or the use of pesticides, or mechanical devices for the purpose of eliminating, exterminating, controlling or preventing infestations or infections of those pests, or organisms.

 (b) “Household pests” are defined for the purpose of this chapter as those pests other than wood destroying pests or organisms, which invade households and other structures, including, but not limited to, rodents, vermin, and
 insects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 2.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.1.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), for the purpose of this act, “fumigation” shall be defined as the use within an enclosed space for the destruction of plant or animal life, a substance having a vapor pressure greater than 5 millimeters of mercury at 25 degrees centigrade when the substance is labeled for those purposes.

The following is a list of lethal fumigants:

(1) Methyl bromide.

(2) Sulfuryl fluoride.

(3) Aluminum phosphide.

The board may adopt,
 and may as necessary amend, by regulation, a list of fumigants.

(b) For the purpose of this act, “warning agent” is any agent used in combination with any fumigant that lacks warning properties.

The following is a warning agent:

Chloropicrin.

The board may adopt, and may as necessary amend, by regulation, a list of warning agents.

(c) For the purpose of this act “simple asphyxiants” shall not be deemed to be fumigants.

The following is a list of simple asphyxiants:

(1) Liquid nitrogen.

(2) Carbon dioxide.

The board may adopt, and may as
 necessary amend, by regulation, a list of simple asphyxiants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 3.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.2.

Fumigation shall be performed only under the direct and personal supervision of an individual who is licensed by the board as an operator or field representative in Branch 1 as set forth in Section 8560.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 4.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.3.

“Direct and personal supervision” as used in Section 8505.2 means that the Branch 1 licensee exercising that supervision shall be present at the site of the fumigation during the entire time the fumigants are being released, the time ventilation is commenced, and at the time property is released for occupancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.4.

Fumigation shall be performed in compliance with all applicable state, county, and city laws and ordinances and all applicable laws and regulations of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.5.

(a) Notice of the date and place of fumigation, and chemicals to be used, shall be given by the fumigator to the fire department serving the area in which fumigation is to be performed not less than two hours prior to the time fumigation begins. The fire department shall not charge any fees for any service related to structural pest control activities except for the costs of an emergency response necessitated by illegal or negligent actions.

(b) Notice of each fumigation to be performed shall be given to the commissioner in the county in which the job is to be performed. The notice, which may be mailed or given by telephone, at the option of the commissioner, shall be given at least
 24 hours prior to the time fumigation begins, unless the commissioner determines that less time is sufficient. A fee shall not be assessed for processing this notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 5.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.7.

The space to be fumigated shall be vacated by all occupants prior to the commencement of fumigation, and all entrances thereto shall be locked, barricaded, or otherwise secured against entry until the end of exposure period, then opened for ventilation and relocked, barricaded, or otherwise secured against re-entry, until declared by the licensee exercising direct and personal supervision over the fumigation to be safe for reoccupancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 4.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.8.

Prior to the commencement of fumigation, the space to be fumigated shall be sealed in such manner that tests taken before ventilation is begun will show that the required concentration of the fumigant released within the space has been retained therein, in compliance with the manufacturer’s recommendations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1201.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.9.

Prior to the commencement of fumigation, warning signs shall be posted in plainly visible locations on or in the immediate vicinity of all entrances to the space under fumigation and shall not be removed until fumigation and ventilation has been completed, and the premises safe for reoccupancy. Ventilation shall be conducted with due regard for the public safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1201.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.10.

Warning signs shall be printed in red on white background and shall contain the following statement in letters not less than two inches in height: “DANGER—FUMIGATION.” They shall also depict a skull and crossbones not less than one inch in height and shall state in letters not less than one-half inch in height the name of the fumigant. These signs shall also include in legible ink of any color, the date and time fumigant was injected, and the name, address, and telephone number of the registered company performing the fumigation. Warning signs placed under a tarpaulin shall not be required to state the time the fumigant was injected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 7.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.11.

If the structure which has been fumigated has an attic or if the area underneath such structure is accessible to inspection for purposes of structural pest control, the registered company which performed the fumigation shall, immediately upon completion, post in the attic, immediately adjacent to the entrance thereto, or in the area underneath the structure, immediately adjacent to the main entrance vent thereof, or in both of such places if the structure has an attic and an accessible underarea, a durable sign not less than five inches by seven inches in size stating the name of the registered company, the date of fumigation, and the type of fumigant used.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 6.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.12.

A registered company performing fumigation shall use an adequate warning agent with all fumigants which lack those properties. There may be circumstances in which the use of chloropicrin is not possible due to its unknown effects on sensitive items, including, but not limited to, artifacts in museums or in police evidence storage. In these circumstances, waiving the use of chloropicrin shall be approved by the state regulatory authority and documented in advance and shall include alternative safety precautions which address initial clearance of the site to be fumigated, potential movement of the fumigant to unattended areas, and continued site security. When conditions involving abnormal hazards exist, the licensee exercising direct and personal supervision shall
 take those safety precautions in addition to those prescribed by this chapter as are reasonably necessary to protect the public health and safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 8.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.13.

A registered company shall maintain a log of each fumigation job performed by it in this state. The log shall be in the form required by the regulations of the board and shall be preserved for a period of at least three years, during which time it shall be available at all times during business hours for inspection by the board and its authorized representatives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 844, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.14.

“Fumigator” means any individual licensed by the board as a structural pest control operator or as a structural pest control field representative in Branch 1 as set forth in Section 8560.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 9.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.16.

All fumigators shall be familiar with and able to administer artificial respiration by the best method or methods recommended currently by the Red Cross in its standard texts on first aid.

All fumigating crews shall be outfitted with a safety kit containing safety equipment as specified by the manufacturer’s label instructions and by all applicable laws and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 844, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.17.

(a) There is hereby continued in existence in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Structural Pest Control Education and Enforcement Fund. Funds derived from the pesticide use report filing fee provided for in Section 8674 and all proceeds from civil penalties collected by the board pursuant to Section 8617 shall be deposited in the Education and Enforcement Account which is hereby created in the fund. The account shall be used by the board (1) for the purposes of training as provided in Section 8616, (2) for reimbursement to the Director of Pesticide Regulation for work performed as the agent of the board pursuant to Sections 8616, 8616.4, and 8617 and Section 15202 of the Food and Agricultural Code and for cases referred to the board pursuant to subdivision (b) of
 Section 8616.5, and (3) for reasonable expenses incurred by the Disciplinary Review Committee. There is no reimbursement from this fund for inspections and routine investigations.

(b) The board may withhold funds from its agent if it is not satisfied that its agent has corrected the problems which resulted in a suspension as provided in Section 8616.6. The authority to withhold funds shall be limited only to the withholding of an amount otherwise due the agent for reimbursable activities performed in the county or counties for which a notice has been filed pursuant to Section 8616.6.

(c) Registered structural pest control companies shall prepare and submit to the county agricultural commissioner a monthly report of all pesticides used in that county. The report shall be on a form approved by the Director of Pesticide Regulation and shall contain the name and registration number of
 each pesticide and the amount used. The report shall be submitted to the commissioner by the 10th day of the month following the month of application and a copy shall be maintained by the licensee for a period of three years after the report submission date. Each pesticide use report or combination of use reports representing a registered structural pest control company’s total county pesticide use for the month shall require a pesticide use stamp or stamp number issued by the board in the denomination fixed by the board in accordance with Section 8674 as the pesticide use report filing fee. The board shall provide for the sale of these stamps and stamp numbers and for the refund of moneys paid for stamps and stamp numbers which are returned to it unused. When a registered structural pest control company performs no pest control during a month in a county in which it has given notice pursuant to Section 15204 of the Food and Agricultural Code, the registered company shall submit a use report stating this
 fact to the commissioner. A pesticide use stamp or stamp number is not required on negative use reports.

(d) All other proceeds from civil penalties collected by the board shall be deposited in the Civil Penalties Account which is hereby created in the fund. These funds shall be available to the board upon appropriation by the Legislature for the purposes of enforcing this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 10.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8506.

(a) “Structural pest control operator” is any individual licensed by the board to practice structural pest control.

(b) As used in this chapter, “operator” refers to “structural pest control operator.”

(c) In the event of death of a licensee, the executor or administrator of the deceased person may obtain from the board written authorization for such executor or administrator to conduct the business of such deceased licensee for a period not to exceed one year after the date of death for the purpose of winding up or disposing of the structural pest control business of the deceased licensee; but such authorization shall not entitle such executor or administrator to solicit, engage in, or undertake any structural pest control work not already contracted for by such deceased licensee unless a properly classified and licensed operator is employed to manage, supervise, and direct the business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 12.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8506.1.

(a) A “registered company” is any sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, or other organization or any combination thereof that is registered with the Structural Pest Control Board to engage in the practice of structural pest control.
